Louisiana, session 2026, HB673.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1563(P) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1563. Powers and duties generally; use of deputies; responsibilities of local
governing authorities with fire prevention bureaus; open structures and
process structures; fees
* * *
P. The state fire marshal, or his designee, may require the owner or lessee
of any abandoned or blighted structure to install and maintain security cameras
capable of obtaining clear, discernable footage of every portion of the exterior of the
abandoned or blighted structure. The security cameras shall be capable of storing
and maintaining all footage for a period of not less than thirty days.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-558 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 673